Arizona, session 57th-2nd-regular, HB2617.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of the State of Arizona: Section 1.1. Title 20, chapter 4, article 3, Arizona Revised Statutes, is amended by adding section 20-841.14, to read: START_STATUTE20-841.14. Prostate cancer; high-risk patients; cost sharing; prohibition; applicability; definition A. A hospital service corporation or medical service corporation that issues, amends or renews a subscription contract on or after January 1, 2027 may not impose cost sharing requirements for diagnostic prostate cancer screenings for high-risk subscribers. b. This section does not apply to out-of-network screenings. c. For the purposes of this section, "High-risk" includes men who are at least forty years of age and to whom any of the following applies: (a) are of african ancestry. (b) carry the Breast cancer gene, including the BRCA1 or BRCA2 gene. (c) have a family history of prostate cancer. For the purposes of this subdivision, "have a family history of prostate cancer" includes a first-degree relative who: (i) Was diagnosed with prostate cancer and who was under SIXTY YEARS of age at the time of diagnosis. (ii) Died of prostate cancer. (iii) Developed a form of cancer that is known to be associated with an increased risk of prostate cancer. (iv) Was diagnosed with a genetic mutation that is known to be associated with an increased risk of prostate cancer. (d) are military veterans and have been exposed to agent orange. END_STATUTE Sec. 2.2. Title 20, chapter 4, article 9, Arizona Revised Statutes, is amended by adding section 20-1057.21, to read: START_STATUTE20-1057.21. Prostate cancer; high-risk patients; cost sharing; prohibition; applicability; definition A. A health care services organization that issues, amends or renews An evidence of coverage on or after January 1, 2027 may not impose cost sharing requirements for diagnostic prostate cancer screenings for high-risk enrollees. b. This section does not apply to out-of-network screenings. c. For the purposes of this section, "High-risk" includes men who are at least forty years of age and to whom any of the following applies: (a) are of african ancestry. (b) carry the Breast cancer gene, including the BRCA1 or BRCA2 gene. (c) have a family history of prostate cancer. For the purposes of this subdivision, "have a family history of prostate cancer" includes a first-degree relative who: (i) Was diagnosed with prostate cancer and who was under sixty years of age at the time of diagnosis. (ii) Died of prostate cancer. (iii) Developed a form of cancer that is known to be associated with an increased risk of prostate cancer. (iv) Was diagnosed with a genetic mutation that is known to be associated with an increased risk of prostate cancer. (d) are military veterans and have been exposed to agent orange. END_STATUTE Sec. 3.3. Title 20, chapter 6, article 4, Arizona Revised Statutes, is amended by adding section 20-1376.11, to read: START_STATUTE20-1376.11. Prostate cancer; high-risk patients; cost sharing; prohibition; applicability; definition A. A disability insurer that issues, amends or renews a policy on or after January 1, 2027 may not impose cost sharing requirements for diagnostic prostate cancer screenings for high-risk insureds. b. This section does not apply to out-of-network screenings. c. For the purposes of this section, "High-risk" includes men who are at least forty years of age and to whom any of the following applies: (a) are of african ancestry. (b) carry the Breast cancer gene, including the BRCA1 or BRCA2 gene. (c) have a family history of prostate cancer. For the purposes of this subdivision, "have a family history of prostate cancer" includes a first-degree relative who: (i) Was diagnosed with prostate cancer and who was under sixty years of age at the time of diagnosis. (ii) Died of prostate cancer. (iii) Developed a form of cancer that is known to be associated with an increased risk of prostate cancer. (iv) Was diagnosed with a genetic mutation that is known to be associated with an increased risk of prostate cancer. (d) are military veterans and have been exposed to agent orange. END_STATUTE Sec. 4.4. Title 20, chapter 6, article 5, Arizona Revised Statutes, is amended by adding section 20-1406.11, to read: START_STATUTE20-1406.11. Prostate cancer; high-risk patients; cost sharing; prohibition; applicability; definition A. A group disability insurer or a blanket disability insurer that issues, amends or renews a policy on or after January 1, 2027 may not impose cost sharing requirements for diagnostic prostate cancer screenings for high-risk insureds. b. This section does not apply to out-of-network screenings. c. For the purposes of this section, "High-risk" includes men who are at least forty years of age and to whom any of the following applies: (a) are of african ancestry. (b) carry the Breast cancer gene, including the BRCA1 or BRCA2 gene. (c) have a family history of prostate cancer.  For the purposes of this subdivision, "have a family history of prostate cancer" includes a first-degree relative who: (i) Was diagnosed with prostate cancer and who was under sixty years of age at the time of diagnosis. (ii) Died of prostate cancer. (iii) Developed a form of cancer that is known to be associated with an increased risk of prostate cancer. (iv) Was diagnosed with a genetic mutation that is known to be associated with an increased risk of prostate cancer. (d) are military veterans and have been exposed to agent orange. END_STATUTE